Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6316
Act; districts exempt.

The Asbestos Control Act shall not apply to a district as defined in section 70-601 or a district subject to sections 14-2101 to 14-2157.

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 74.